District of Columbia statutes.
38-2611

CTE grant program.

(a)

There is established the career and technical education grant program, which shall be administered by OSSE, that, beginning in the 2015-2016 school year, shall provide supplemental funds to DCPS and to public charter schools to support and enhance career and technical education programs.

(b)

Grants awarded pursuant to the CTE grant program shall be supplemental to Formula, federal, or other funds received by a school for career and technical education.

(c)

By October 1, 2014, OSSE shall issue regulations for the implementation of this section.

History

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-176, § 7e
as added Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-87, § 2(c), 61 DCR 309

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-2602.

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-87 added this section.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 13-176, § 7e, concerning educator evaluations,, see § 2(b) of the Educator Evaluation Data Collection Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-132, Aug. 8, 2014, 61 DCR 6338).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 13-176, § 7e, concerning educator evaluations, see § 2(b) of the Educator Evaluation Data Collection Emergency Amendment Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-328, May 22, 2014, 61 DCR 5361).